New Jersey, session 221, S217.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Beginning one year after the effective date of this section, no person shall sell, offer for sale, or distribute within the State a gas-powered leaf blower for use or operation in the State. b.    Beginning four years after the effective date of this section, no person shall use or operate a gas-powered leaf blower in the State. c.     Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than $500 nor more than $1,000 for each offense.  State and local law enforcement shall have exclusive authority to enforce this section and the penalty imposed shall be collected and enforced by summary proceedings under the "Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999," P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.).  If the violation is of a continuing nature, each day during which the violation continues shall constitute an additional, separate, and distinct offense.  The Superior Court and the municipal court shall have jurisdiction of proceedings for the enforcement of the penalty provided by this section.  Any penalty recovered under this section shall be retained by the enforcing government entity. d.    As used in this section: Gas-powered leaf blower means a leaf blower that has a two-stroke or four-stroke engine and uses gasoline or a gasoline and oil blend as fuel. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.